Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2785.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 34.401 of Title 62, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
In addition to other duties imposed upon the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services (OMES) by law, the Director of
the Office of Management and Enterprise Services shall ensure that
HB2785 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

the following procedures are strictly adhered to with respect to the
Oklahoma Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services:
1. In accordance with paragraph 3 of subsection A of Section
34.6 of this title, prior to releasing the one-twelfth (1/12)
appropriations disbursement, OMES shall conduct a review of the
agency's budget to actuals to ensure the agency is staying within
budget constraints;
2. OMES shall provide a report to the Governor, the Speaker of
the Oklahoma House of Representatives, the President Pro Tempore of
the Oklahoma State Senate, and the chairs and vice-chairs of the
standing committees of the Oklahoma House of Representatives and the
Oklahoma State Senate having primary responsibility for the
consideration of agency appropriations concerning the status of
revenue and expenditures of the agency;
3. The Oklahoma Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse
Services shall be prohibited from entering into contracts that do
not clearly state a maximum fiscal obligation;
4. OMES shall review encumbrances for any multi-year purchase
orders or contracts to ensure that only the anticipated amount of
funds for the current fiscal year are encumbered; and
5. OMES shall prohibit the processing of payments for non-
budgeted expenditures.
SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
HB2785 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON JOINT COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS
AND BUDGET, dated 05/19/2025 - DO PASS, As Amended.




















HB2785 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.